Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4 HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
25.5-6-409.3. Consolidated waiver - intellectual and developmental disabilities - conflict-free case management - legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly declares that it is the intent of the general assembly that moneys appropriated for services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities be spent in the most effective manner, thereby enabling the greatest number of eligible individuals to receive the services that they need in the amounts needed so that they may live successfully in the community. Therefore, the general assembly finds that the best mechanism for providing adequate services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities is to have a single consolidated medicaid waiver for home- and community-based individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Further, the general assembly acknowledges the rights of individuals to make choices regarding their case managers and service providers. Therefore, the general assembly believes there exists the need to ensure conflict-free case management services within the medicaid waivers for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

The state department shall establish a redesigned medicaid waiver for home- and community-based services for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities, effective July 1, 2016, or as soon as the centers for medicare and medicaid services approves the redesigned waiver.

The redesigned waiver must include flexible service definitions, provide access to services and supports when and where they are needed, offer services and supports based on the individual's needs and preferences, and incorporate the following principles:

Freedom of choice over living arrangements and social, community, and recreational opportunities;

Individual authority over supports and services;

Support to organize resources in ways that are meaningful to the individual receiving services;

Health and safety assurances;

Opportunity for community contribution; and

Responsible use of public dollars.

(3.3) (a) The state department's administration of the redesigned waiver shall include:

A functional eligibility and needs assessment tool used for the redesigned waiver that aligns with the recommendations of the community living advisory group and that is fully integrated with the assessment process for all clients receiving long-term services and supports;

An assessment process that is person-centered, demonstrates inter-rater reliability, is norm referenced for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities, and includes the following principles and goals:

Maximum personal control;

System transparency; and

Support needed to achieve key service outcomes, including health and welfare, improving quality of life, increasing independence, and supporting employment and community integration; and

A service payment system that ensures fair distribution of available resources and that is efficient, transparent, and equitable for both providers and consumers.

As part of the state department's fiscal year 2016-17 budget request to the joint budget committee, the state department shall include a justification for the continued use of the supports intensity scale assessment. If the joint budget committee concludes that the justification is insufficient to continue the use of the supports intensity scale assessment, the state department shall present a plan to the joint budget committee for the transition to a different assessment tool that meets the principles and goals set forth in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.3), as well as a timeline for transition to the new assessment tool that comports with the time frame set forth in subsection (2) of this section for the administration of the single consolidated medicaid waiver.

(3.5) The redesigned waiver must ensure continuity of support, including residential services, for eligible individuals enrolled in the home- and community-based services waivers serving adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities who were receiving services as of January 1, 2016, and who have maintained waiver eligibility.

The state department shall notify the joint budget committee no later than June 1, 2016, if the centers for medicare and medicaid services has not approved a single consolidated medicaid waiver for home- and community-based services for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities. If the state department has not received approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services by July 1, 2016, the joint budget committee shall establish a notification and review process relating to the status of the pending waiver consolidation process.

No later than July 1, 2016, the state department, with input from community-centered boards, single entry point agencies, and other stakeholders, shall develop a plan for the delivery of conflict-free case management services that complies with the federal regulations relating to person-centered planning. The plan must include a reasonable timeline for implementation of the plan. The state department may hire a consultant to assist with plan development. During the budget process for the 2016-17 legislative session, the state department shall report to the joint budget committee on the development of the plan and any statutory changes required to implement the plan.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1318), ch. 304, p. 1248, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(6) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

25.5-6-409.5. Transition plan for youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities to adult services - legislative declaration - report - rules - cash fund.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are eighteen to twenty years of age are currently served through the county child welfare system; and

The home- and community-based services program for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities is better designed to meet the complex needs of these youth.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that, in order to have a person-centered system, youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are eighteen years of age and older who are currently being served through child welfare services must be transitioned to the home- and community-based services program for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and a plan developed for the ongoing transition of such youth when they turn eighteen years of age, except in extenuating circumstances when the court or interdisciplinary team determines that it is not in the best interest of the youth to transition.

On or before June 30, 2014, each county department of human or social services shall identify youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are receiving services through the child welfare system in that county and who:

Are twenty years of age or older as of June 30, 2014;

Are nineteen years of age or older but younger than twenty-one years of age as of June 30, 2014;

Are eighteen years of age or older but younger than twenty years of age as of June 30, 2014; and

Will become eighteen years of age on or after June 30, 2014, and before January 1, 2015.

On or before October 1, 2014, and as necessary thereafter, each county department of human or social services shall identify youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are receiving services through the child welfare system in that county and who will become eighteen years of age within the following six months.

Each county department of human or social services shall develop a plan to transition youth identified pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3) to adult services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities. The transition plan must meet the criteria set forth in subsection (4) of this section and any rules promulgated by the state board to implement this section. Each county's plan must provide for:

Youth described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) to be transitioned as soon as possible but in no case later than January 1, 2016; and

Youth described in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) to be transitioned as soon as possible based on individual needs but in no case earlier than their eighteenth birthday.

The requirement to transition youth as set forth in subsection (3)(c) of this section does not apply to youth currently serving a sentence in the division of youth services or to youth under a court order in a juvenile delinquency case, unless the court approves the transition by written court order.

For each youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities who is going to be transitioned to adult services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the county department of human or social services that is currently providing services to the youth through its child welfare system shall develop a transition plan for that youth. The transition plan must, at a minimum:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Include the department-prescribed assessment provided by the community-centered board that is performed as soon as possible for those youth who are being transitioned pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and at seventeen and a half years of age for those youth who are being transitioned pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section or paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section. In all instances, the assessment must be completed within six months of a youth's transition to adult services.

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Include the department-prescribed assessment provided by the case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702 that is performed as soon as possible for those youth who are being transitioned pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and at seventeen and a half years of age for those youth who are being transitioned pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(IV) or (3)(b) of this section. In all instances, the assessment must be completed within six months of a youth's transition to adult services.

Provide for the social, habilitative, remedial, residential, educational, health, and other needs of the youth who is being transitioned; and

Address any legal needs concerning guardianship of the youth who is being transitioned.

In all instances, the involved parties and the county department of human or social services shall consider and place precedence on the best interest of the youth prior to the transition process, as set forth in sections 19-3-205 and 19-3-213, C.R.S.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective until July 1, 2024.] It is the intent of the general assembly that county child welfare systems and community-centered boards collaborate to ensure minimal disruption for youth during the transition process.

(6)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (6) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

It is the intent of the general assembly that county child welfare systems and case management agencies, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, collaborate to ensure minimal disruption for youth during the transition process.

The medical services board and the state board of human services may promulgate rules as necessary and appropriate for the implementation of this section.

The department shall submit a report to the joint budget committee on or before January 1, 2015, and on or before January 1, 2016, on the status of the youth being transitioned. The report must include, at a minimum:

The number of youth transitioned to date by county;

The needs assessment of the youth who have been transitioned; and

The type of adult residential locations of the youth who have been transitioned.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1368), ch. 304, p. 1289, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(3)(d) amended, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1983, § 60, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(4)(a) and (6) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 336, § 34, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (9), effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2014, p. 1289.)

25.5-6-410. Qualification for federal funding.

Nothing in this part 4 shall prevent the state department or the department of human services from complying with federal requirements in order for the state of Colorado to qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1947, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-630 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-411. Personal needs trust fund required.

All personal needs funds shall be held in trust by a residential facility authorized to provide services pursuant to this part 4, or its designated trustee, separate and apart from any other funds of the facility, in a checking account or savings account or any combination thereof established to protect and separate the personal needs funds of the clients. At all times, the principal and all income derived from said principal in the personal needs trust fund shall remain the property of the participating clients, and the facility or its designated trustee is bound by all of the duties imposed by law upon fiduciaries in the handling of such fund including accounting for all expenditures from the fund.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1947, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-631 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-412. Cross-system response for behavioral health crises pilot program - legislative declaration - creation - criteria - recommendations - fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1368), ch. 308, p. 1258, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

IP(3) and (3)(e) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1329, § 208, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2015, p. 1258.)

25.5-6-413. Elimination of subminimum wage - transition plan for individuals with disabilities - waiver - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The payment of subminimum wages is an economic justice issue for individuals with disabilities, impacting their ability to earn wages equal to their peers without disabilities and devaluing their contributions based on their disabilities;

Service enhancements and public policy changes are needed to address these systemic barriers and assist individuals in subminimum wage jobs to pursue competitive integrated employment; and

The elimination of subminimum wage employment, along with the implementation of critical service enhancements and policy changes, is essential to promoting economic justice for, and the enhanced self-sufficiency of, individuals with disabilities while ensuring that individuals currently working in subminimum wage jobs can successfully transition to competitive integrated employment, supported employment, or integrated community activities related to each individual's employment goals.

The state department shall seek federal approval, with an effective date on or before July 1, 2023, to add the following medicaid waiver services for adults with intellectual and developmental disabilities to assist them with pursuing competitive integrated employment:

Support to provide line-of-sight supervision on the job as a less intensive and less expensive alternative to individual job coaching, when appropriate; and

Ongoing benefits counseling to assist such adults in earning higher incomes while retaining necessary supports.

The state department shall collaborate with stakeholders to develop service coverage standards, reimbursement rates, and limitations on the services described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

The state department shall seek federal approval, with an effective date on or before July 1, 2023, to remove the following services from the service plan authorization limits to ensure access to employment supports:

Job coaching, individual; and

Job development, individual.

The state department shall collaborate with stakeholders to publish clarifying guidance regarding allowable activities under services described in subsection (3) of this section.

As used in this section, "competitive integrated employment" has the same meaning as set forth in section 8-84-301 (3).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-039), ch. 380, p. 2548, § 6, effective July 1.